Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1666.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. The definition of "financial responsibility" in section 1702 of Title 75 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended to read:§ 1702. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this chapter shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:* * *"Financial responsibility." The ability to respond in damages for liability on account of accidents arising out of the maintenance or use of a motor vehicle in the amount of $15,000 1234567891011121314151617181920 because of injury to one person in any one accident, in the amount of $30,000 because of injury to two or more persons in any one accident and in the amount of [$5,000] $25,000 because of damage to property of others in any one accident. The financial responsibility shall be in a form acceptable to the Department of Transportation.* * *Section 2. Sections 1774(a)(3), 1788(a), 1791 and 1792(a) of Title 75 are amended to read:§ 1774. Payments sufficient to satisfy judgments.(a) General rule.--For the purpose of this chapter only, judgments shall be deemed satisfied upon the occurrence of one of the following:* * *(3) When [$5,000] $25,000 has been credited upon any judgment or judgments rendered in excess of that amount because of damage to property of others as the result of any one accident.* * *§ 1788. Neighborhood electric vehicles.(a) Minimum coverage requirements.--A neighborhood electric vehicle that is registered or operated on a highway shall be covered by financial responsibility [in the amount of $15,000 for injury to one person in any one accident, in the amount of $30,000 for injury to two or more persons in any one accident and in the amount of $5,000 for damage of property of others in any one accident. The financial responsibility shall be in a form acceptable to the department].* * *§ 1791. Notice of available benefits and limits.20250HB1666PN2033 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 It shall be presumed that the insured has been advised of the benefits and limits available under this chapter provided the following notice in bold print of at least ten-point type is given to the applicant at the time of application for original coverage, and no other notice or rejection shall be required:IMPORTANT NOTICEInsurance companies operating in the Commonwealth of Pennsylvania are required by law to make available for purchase the following benefits for you, your spouse or other relatives or minors in your custody or in the custody of your relatives, residing in your household, occupants of your motor vehicle or persons struck by your motor vehicle:(1) Medical benefits, up to at least $100,000.(1.1) Extraordinary medical benefits, from $100,000 to $1,100,000 which may be offered in increments of $100,000.(2) Income loss benefits, up to at least $2,500 per month up to a maximum benefit of at least $50,000.(3) Accidental death benefits, up to at least $25,000.(4) Funeral benefits, $2,500.(5) As an alternative to paragraphs (1), (2), (3) and (4), a combination benefit, up to at least $177,500 of benefits in the aggregate or benefits payable up to three years from the date of the accident, whichever occurs first, subject to a limit on accidental death benefit of up to $25,000 and a limit on funeral benefit of $2,500, provided that nothing contained in this subsection shall be construed to limit, reduce, modify or 20250HB1666PN2033 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 change the provisions of section 1715(d) (relating to availability of adequate limits).(6) Uninsured, underinsured and bodily injury liability coverage up to at least $100,000 because of injury to one person in any one accident and up to at least $300,000 because of injury to two or more persons in any one accident or, at the option of the insurer, up to at least $300,000 in a single limit for these coverages, except for policies issued under the Assigned Risk Plan. Also, at least [$5,000] $25,000 for damage to property of others in any one accident.Additionally, insurers may offer higher benefit levels than those enumerated above as well as additional benefits. However, an insured may elect to purchase lower benefit levels than those enumerated above.Your signature on this notice or your payment of any renewal premium evidences your actual knowledge and understanding of the availability of these benefits and limits as well as the benefits and limits you have selected.If you have any questions or you do not understand all of the various options available to you, contact your agent or company.If you do not understand any of the provisions contained in this notice, contact your agent or company before you sign.§ 1792. Availability of uninsured, underinsured, bodily injury liability and property damage coverages and mandatory deductibles.(a) Availability of coverages.--Except for policies issued 20250HB1666PN2033 - 4 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 under Subchapter D (relating to Assigned Risk Plan), an insurer issuing a policy of bodily injury liability coverage pursuant to this chapter shall make available for purchase higher limits of uninsured, underinsured and bodily injury liability coverages up to at least $100,000 because of injury to one person in any one accident and up to at least $300,000 because of injury to two or more persons in any one accident or, at the option of the insurer, up to at least $300,000 in a single limit for these coverages. Additionally, an insurer shall make available for purchase at least [$5,000] $25,000 because of damage to property of others in any one accident. However, the exclusion of availability relating to the Assigned Risk Plan shall not apply to damage to property of others in any one accident.* * *Section 3. Any change in coverage of a motor vehicle liability insurance policy resulting from the amendment of 75 Pa.C.S. § 1702 shall not:(1) Impact the validity of any waiver, rejection, election of tort options, selection of benefits or amount of benefits in that policy, beyond the coverage change as a result of the amendment of 75 Pa.C.S. § 1702.(2) Require that new forms be signed by the named insured in that policy.Section 4. The amendment of 75 Pa.C.S. § 1702 shall apply to all policies issued or renewed on or after the effective date of this section.Section 5. Any notice of available benefits and limits issued under 75 Pa.C.S. § 1791 prior to the effective date of this section that specifies "at least $5,000 for damage to property of others in any one accident" shall not be deemed 20250HB1666PN2033 - 5 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 invalid solely on the basis of the reference to the $5,000 dollar amount.Section 6. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1666PN2033 - 6 - 123